Illinois, session 104th, SB2004.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2A-1.2 and 10-6 and by adding Sections 7-99, 16-99, 617-99, 18-99, and Article 22A as follows: 7    (10 ILCS 5/7-99 new)8    Sec. 7-99. Ranked-choice voting. For an election conducted 9using ranked-choice voting, the provisions of this Article may 10be modified or interpreted to the extent necessary to 11implement the provisions of Article 22A. 12    (10 ILCS 5/16-99 new)13    Sec. 16-99. Ranked-choice voting.For an election conducted 14using ranked-choice voting, the provisions of this Article may 15be modified or interpreted to the extent necessary to 16implement ranked-choice voting elections under Article 22A. 17    (10 ILCS 5/17-99 new)18    Sec. 17-99. Ranked-choice voting. For an election 19conducted using ranked-choice voting, the provisions of this 20Article may be modified or interpreted to the extent necessary 21to implement the provisions of Article 22A.   SB2004- 2 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1    (10 ILCS 5/18-99 new)2    Sec. 18-99. Ranked-choice voting. For an election 3conducted using ranked-choice voting, the provisions of this 4Article may be modified or interpreted to the extent necessary 5to implement the provisions of Article 22A. 6    (10 ILCS 5/Art. 22A heading new)7ARTICLE 22A. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING 8    (10 ILCS 5/22A-1 new)9    Sec. 22A-1. Definitions. As used in this Article:10    "Active ballot" means a ballot that counts for an active 11candidate.12    "Active candidate" means any candidate who has not been 13eliminated or elected.14    "Ranking" means the number available to be assigned by a 15voter to a candidate to express the voter's preference for 16that candidate.17    "Round" means an instance of the sequence of vote 18tabulation.  19    (10 ILCS 5/22A-5 new)20    Sec. 22A-5. Ranked-choice voting in local elections.21    (a) A unit of local government may allow for any local 22primary election, general election, or special election to be   SB2004- 3 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1conducted by ranked-choice voting in accordance with this 2Article. A unit of local government that conducts its general 3election or special election by ranked-choice voting may do so 4without holding a separate primary election or runoff 5election.6    (b) A unit of local government that implements 7ranked-choice voting shall:8        (1) specify whether the system will be used for 9    single-seat elections, multi-seat elections, or both;10        (2) ensure that voting systems used are compatible 11    with ranked-choice voting and are certified by the State 12    Board of Elections; and13        (3) provide voter education materials to inform the 14    electorate about ranked-choice voting. 15    (10 ILCS 5/22A-10 new)16    Sec. 22A-10. Ranked-choice voting ballot. In an election 17conducted by ranked-choice voting, the ballot shall allow 18voters to rank candidates in order of preference as follows:19        (1) in a single-winner ranked-choice voting election, 20    the ballot shall allow voters to rank at least 5 21    candidates, including declared write-in candidates; or22        (2) in a multi-winner ranked-choice voting election, 23    the ballot shall allow voters to rank at least 4 more 24    candidates than the number of seats to be nominated or 25    elected, including declared write-in candidates.  SB2004- 4 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1    If there are fewer candidates than the number of rankings 2required in this Section, the number of rankings may be 3reduced as necessary. The number of rankings allowed in an 4election for any office shall be uniform for all elections for 5that office in this State. 6    (10 ILCS 5/22A-15 new)7    Sec. 22A-15. Application of ranked-choice voting to 8localities. 9    (a) In any an election for one office is conducted by 10ranked-choice voting, each ballot counts as one vote for its 11highest-ranked active candidate. The candidate with the 12highest number of votes at the end of tabulation is nominated 13or elected. The tabulation of votes proceeds in rounds as 14follows:15        (1) if no active candidate has received a majority of 16    active ballots, the active candidate with the fewest votes 17    is eliminated, and votes for the eliminated candidate 18    count for each ballot's next-ranked active candidate; and19        (2) if a candidate is ranked the highest on a majority 20    of active ballots, the tabulation of votes is complete.21    (b) In an election for more than one office conducted by 22ranked-choice voting, each ballot counts in whole or in part 23for its highest-ranked active candidate. Candidates are 24nominated or elected if they receive the minimum whole number 25of votes needed to win. To determine the threshold required to   SB2004- 5 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1win, the total number of valid votes cast shall be divided by 2the sum of one and the number of seats to be filled, rounded 3down to the nearest whole number, and added by one. If a 4candidate receives more votes than the threshold, part of each 5vote received by that candidate counts for each ballot's 6next-ranked active candidate instead. If no active candidate 7meets the threshold, the candidate with the fewest votes is 8eliminated and votes for that candidate count for each 9ballot's next-ranked active candidate. The State Board of 10Elections shall establish guidelines and best practices for 11administering multi-winner ranked-choice elections.12    (c) Ballots in a ranked-choice voting election shall be 13treated as follows:14        (1) an under-vote does not count as an active or 15    inactive ballot in any round of tabulation of that 16    election;17        (2) an inactive ballot is a ballot that ceases during 18    tabulation to count for any candidate for the remainder of 19    tabulation of the election for that office because either:20            (A) all candidates ranked on the ballot have 21        become inactive; or22            (B) the ballot includes an over-vote and any 23        candidates ranked higher than the over-vote have 24        become inactive;25        (3) during tabulation, a ballot shall remain active 26    and continue to count for its highest-ranked active   SB2004- 6 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1    candidate notwithstanding any skipped ranking or repeated 2    ranking on the ballot; and3        (4) if a candidate withdraws, dies, or for any reason 4    becomes disqualified after the ballots have been printed, 5    the candidate shall be treated as an eliminated candidate 6    during tabulation unless a ranking for that candidate is 7    to be deemed to be a ranking for a substitute candidate 8    under applicable law.9    (d) If 2 or more candidates are tied with the fewest number 10of votes, and tabulation cannot continue until the tie is 11resolved, the tie shall be resolved by lot. Election officials 12may resolve prospective ties between candidates prior to 13tabulation. The result of any tie resolution must be recorded 14and reused in the event of a recount.15    (e) As used in this Section:16    "Overvote" means a voter ranks more than one candidate at 17the same ranking.18    "Repeated ranking" means a voter ranks the same candidate 19at multiple rankings. 20    "Skipped ranking" means a voter leaves a ranking 21unassigned but ranks a candidate at a subsequent ranking.22    "Undervote" means a voter does not rank any candidates in 23an election for a particular office. 24    (10 ILCS 5/22A-20 new)25    Sec. 22A-20. Rulemaking. Notwithstanding any law to the   SB2004- 7 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1contrary, the State Board of Elections shall adopt any rules 2necessary to implement this Article, including a process to 3release: (1) unofficial preliminary round-by-round results on 4election night; (2) unofficial preliminary ballot-level 5ranking data in a machine-readable and searchable open format 6no later than when the counting of ballots is complete; (3) 7official final round-by-round results upon certification of 8the results; and (4) official final ballot-level ranking data 9in a machine-readable and searchable open format upon 10certification of the results. 11    (10 ILCS 5/22A-25 new)12    Sec. 22A-25. Software standards. The State Board of 13Elections shall establish standards for the use of existing 14vote tabulating software in elections conducted by 15ranked-choice voting. Any person, firm, or corporation 16manufacturing, owning, or offering for sale any vote 17tabulation software designed to be used with existing voting 18systems may apply to the State Board of Elections, in the 19manner prescribed by the State Board of Elections, to have 20examined a production version of the software. A unit of local 21government that makes the decision to conduct elections by 22ranked-choice voting shall provide for the use of vote 23tabulating software approved by the State Board of Elections 24in the elections.   SB2004- 8 -LRB104 11266 SPS 21350 b1    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 2severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 3    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 4becoming law.